District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

35-205

Glass vestibules required for street car motormen; penalties; exception.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 1001, ch. 1434
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 10, 50 DCR 10996

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 44-205.
1973 Ed., § 44-205.